Washington statutes.
RCW 30A.44.250

Reopening.

Whenever the director has taken possession of a bank for any cause, he or she may wind up such corporation and cancel its certificate of authority, unless enjoined from so doing, as herein provided. Or if at any time within ninety days after taking possession, he or she shall determine that all impairment and delinquencies have been made good, and that it is safe and expedient for such corporation to reopen, he or she may permit such corporation to reopen upon such terms and conditions as he or she shall prescribe. Before being permitted to reopen, every such corporation shall pay all of the expenses of the director, as herein elsewhere defined.

[ 2014 c 37 s 241; 1994 c 92 s 129; 1955 c 33 s 30.44.250. Prior: 1917 c 80 s 73; RRS s 3280. Formerly RCW 30.44.250.]